Massachusetts, session 194th, H1862.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 266 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 49 the following section:-
Section 49A. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings:-
“Motor vehicle key programming or emulating device”, means any device, computer
program, application, or software designed or used to electronically communicate with a motor
vehicle for the purpose of programming or emulating a motor vehicle key fob that is capable of
being used to unlock or start the motor vehicle.
“Relay attack device” means any device, computer program, application, or software
designed to intercept the signal from the key fob of a motor vehicle to unlock or start the motor
vehicle.
of 2

(b) No person shall, with intent to steal a motor vehicle or other property therefrom,
knowingly manufacture, sell, offer to sell, transfer, or possess a motor vehicle key programming
or emulating device or relay attack device.
(c) No person shall, with intent to steal a motor vehicle or other property therefrom,
knowingly aid or permit another to use a motor vehicle key programming or emulating relay
attack advice.
(d) Whoever violates this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison
for not more than ten years, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars and imprisonment
in jail for not more than two- and one-half years.
of 2